Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.070

Sale of property.

The owner, subject to RCW 19.150.090 and 19.150.100, may sell the property, other than personal papers and personal photographs, upon complying with the requirements set forth in RCW 19.150.080.

[ 2007 c 113 s 4; 1988 c 240 s 8.]